example.twol
!! Finnish consonant gradation - example TwoL grammar
!! Based on standard hfst-twolc notation

Alphabet
  a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
  ä ö å
  A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
  Ä Ö Å
  k:g k:v k:0
  p:v p:b p:0
  t:d t:0
  n:m
  0:i 0:e
;

Sets
  Vowel    = a e i o u y ä ö å A E I O U Y Ä Ö Å ;
  Consonant = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z
              B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Z ;

Definitions
  VowelSeq = Vowel+ ;
  ClosedSyll = Consonant Vowel Consonant ;

Rules

  !! k:g — voiced in intervocalic position
  "k:g in intervocalic position" k:g <=> Vowel _ Vowel ;

  !! k:v — labialised before u/o
  k:v <=> Vowel _ (Vowel* u | Vowel* o) ;

  !! k:0 — deleted in coda before consonant
  k:0 => _ Consonant ;

  !! p:v — spirantisation
  p:v <=> Vowel _ Vowel ;

  !! t:d — lenition
  t:d <=> Vowel _ Vowel ;

  !! Vowel epenthesis: 0:i inserted between two consonants
  0:i => Consonant _ Consonant ;

  !! Prohibition: do not insert vowel word-initially
  0:i /=> .#. _ ;
